District of Columbia statutes.
31-3408.01

Compliance with other laws.

Health maintenance organizations shall comply with the following laws:

(1)

Chapter 3 of this title;

(2)

Chapter 19 of this title;

(3)

Chapter 14 of this title;

(4)

Subchapter I of Chapter 7 of this title;

(5)

Chapter 21 of this title; and

(6)

The Reasonable Health Insurance Ratemaking Reform Act of 2010 [Chapters 30A, 31C, and 33A of this title].

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 9a
as added Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-252, § 2(d), 50 DCR 225
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 502(a), 58 DCR 896

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-360 deleted “and” from the end of par. (4), substituted “; and” for a period the end of par. (5), and added par. (6).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 14-252: Section 3 of D.C. Law 14-252 provided: “This act shall not apply until the Commissioner gives written notice that all necessary rules and administrative procedures are in place to effect the provisions of this act.”